Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.110

City manager—Appointment of subordinates—Qualifications—Terms.

Appointments made by or under the authority of the city manager shall be on the basis of ability and training or experience of the appointees in the duties which they are to perform, and shall be in compliance with provisions of any merit system applicable to such city. Residence within the code city shall not be a requirement. All such appointments shall be without definite term.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.110.]